Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6069.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15. Beginning April 1, 2027, the fund shall include in its written agreements provisions for an event of default and clawback of funds for a recipient of funds, including a loan, a grant, or funding or other assistance for a project under this act, if the recipient reports a new listing on the registry described in section 7 of the anti-offshoring accountability act during the term of the agreement. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. _____ (request no. S02212'25) or House Bill No. 6070 (request no. H02212'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.